Vermont, session 2025-2026, H876.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Right to Know How Safe We Are Act of
2026.”
VT LEG #386221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.876
2026 Page 2 of 4
Sec. 2. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to increase public accountability and safety by
requiring each State’s Attorney and the Attorney General’s office to file
reports with State lawmakers and the Governor summarizing the decisions
made by each office as investigations of crimes conclude.
Sec. 3. ANNUAL REPORTS
(a)(1) The Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs shall create an
annual statewide report based on aggregated, deidentified information obtained
from each State’s Attorney regarding the following information:
(A) the number of arrests or referrals for each offense, the number
accepted for prosecution, the number of cases referred to pre-charge court
diversion, and the number of dismissals either by the prosecution or the court
with a categorical description of why the case was dismissed; and
(B) disposition for all offenses, including the number of cases:
(i) disposed of through court diversion;
(ii) that result in a conviction based on a plea agreement;
(iii) dismissed by the prosecution because the defendant pled
guilty to a different offense;
(iv) dismissed by the prosecution because another prosecutor’s
office is pursuing the case;
VT LEG #386221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.876
2026 Page 3 of 4
(v) dismissed by the court based on a finding of suppression of
evidence;
(vi) dismissed because a witness refuses to cooperate with the
prosecution;
(vii) dismissed by the court for any other reason, including legal
defect;
(viii) convictions based upon a trial before the court; and
(ix) convictions based upon a jury trial.
(2) The Department for State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs shall compile the
information acquired from each State’s Attorney in a uniform fashion
searchable by jurisdiction and offense. Each State’s Attorney’s office shall
provide the Department with any necessary information to effectuate this act.
(b)(1) The Attorney General shall create an annual statewide report based
on aggregated, deidentified information regarding the information required by
subdivision (a)(1) of this section on cases in which the Criminal Division of
the Attorney General’s office assumed responsibility.
(2) The Attorney General shall compile the information in a uniform
fashion searchable by jurisdiction and offense.
(c) The Attorney General and the Department for State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs shall submit the annual reports required by this act on or before March
1 to the Governor and the General Assembly.
VT LEG #386221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.876
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386221 v.1